apertium-nn-nb.nn.dix
<pardef n="palladi/um__n">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>     <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l>     <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uma</l>   <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>umi</l>   <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>    <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>et</l>    <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>umet</l>  <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>    <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="f/ot__n">
  <e>       <p><l>øtene</l> <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øter</l>  <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oten</l>  <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ot</l>    <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ættled__n">
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ane</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ar</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="h/and__n">
  <e>       <p><l>endene</l><r>and<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ender</l> <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>anda</l>  <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>andi</l>  <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>and</l>   <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s"/></e>
</pardef>
<!-- /regular (compounding) nouns -->
     <!-- Exceptions, nouns w/o compounding -->
<pardef n="STD_f/e_no-cp__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>   <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>    <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>     <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ep_no-cp__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ane</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ty_no-cp__n">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ør_no-cp__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ane</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ene</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>er</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ør/e_no-cp__n">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ane</l>   <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l>     <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>    <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l>     <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>    <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>     <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ane</l>   <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l>     <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>     <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>    <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>     <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="å_no-cp__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="vit_no-cp__n">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>vetta</l> <r>vit<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>vetti</l> <r>vit<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>vita</l>  <r>vit<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>viti</l>  <r>vit<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>vett</l>  <r>vit<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>vit</l>   <r>vit<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>vettet</l><r>vit<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>vitet</l> <r>vit<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>vett</l>  <r>vit<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>vit</l>   <r>vit<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="tv_no-cp__n">
  <e>       <p><l>-ane</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-ar</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-en</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="li">              <i>li</i><par n="å_no-cp__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fòr"><i>fòr</i><par n="å_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="vit">		 <i></i><par n="vit_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="te">              <i>te</i><par n="ep_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="strand">          <i>str</i><par n="h/and__n"/></e>
<e lm="von">             <i>von</i><par n="å_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="tog">             <i>tog</i><par n="ty_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="ull">             <i>ull</i><par n="å_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="villand">         <i>vill</i><par n="h/and__n"/></e>
<e lm="uro">             <i>uro</i><par n="å_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="fil">             <i>fil</i><par n="å_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="ham">             <i>ham</i><par n="ep_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="hat">             <i>hat</i><par n="ty_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="hand">            <i>h</i><par n="h/and__n"/></e>
<e lm="by">              <i>by</i><par n="ep_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="hi">              <i>hi</i><par n="ty_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="bru">             <i>bru</i><par n="å_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="førehand">        <i>føreh</i><par n="h/and__n"/></e>
<e lm="her">             <i>her</i><par n="ep_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="eik">             <i>eik</i><par n="å_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="bad">             <i>bad</i><par n="ty_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="arm">             <i>arm</i><par n="ep_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="slå">             <i>slå</i><par n="å_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="ra">              <i>ra</i><par n="ty_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="øy">              <i>øy</i><par n="ør_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="sky">             <i>sky</i><par n="å_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="ny">              <i>ny</i><par n="ty_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="nu">              <i>nu</i><par n="ep_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="ol">              <i>ol</i><par n="å_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="lin">             <i>lin</i><par n="ty_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="mai">             <i>mai</i><par n="ep_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="lik">             <i>lik</i><par n="ty_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="jul">             <i>jul</i><par n="å_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="myr">             <i>myr</i><par n="ør_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="økt"><i>økt</i><par n="å_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="giv">             <i>giv</i><par n="ep_no-cp__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aks"><i>aks</i><par n="ty_no-cp__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aur"><i>aur</i><par n="ep_no-cp__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bh"><i>bh</i><par n="tv_no-cp__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bladfot"><i>bladf</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bås"><i>bås</i><par n="ep_no-cp__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ego"><i>ego</i><par n="ty_no-cp__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fas"><i>fas</i><par n="ep_no-cp__n"/></e>
    <e lm="feltfot"><i>feltf</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="framfot"><i>framf</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="frifot"><i>frif</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="griffelfot"><i>griffelf</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gåsefot"><i>gåsef</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="harefot"><i>haref</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hy"><i>hy</i><par n="ty_no-cp__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ilk"><i>ilk</i><par n="ep_no-cp__n"/></e>
    <e lm="juletrefot"><i>juletref</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kje"><i>kje</i><par n="ty_no-cp__n"/></e>
    <e lm="klatrefot"><i>klatref</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="krigsfot"><i>krigsf</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kåk"><i>kåk</i><par n="ep_no-cp__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lad"><i>lad</i><par n="ty_no-cp__n"/></e>
    <e lm="larvefot"><i>larvef</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mellomfot"><i>mellomf</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nek"><i>nek</i><par n="ty_no-cp__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nup"><i>nup</i><par n="ep_no-cp__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nød"><i>nød</i><par n="å_no-cp__n"/></e>
    <e lm="palladium"><i>palladi</i><par n="palladi/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plattfot"><i>plattf</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="påk"><i>påk</i><par n="ep_no-cp__n"/></e>
    <e lm="reisefot"><i>reisef</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="run"><i>run</i><par n="ty_no-cp__n"/></e>
    <e lm="søl"><i>søl</i><par n="ty_no-cp__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tannfot"><i>tannf</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tee"><i>tee</i><par n="tv_no-cp__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tub"><i>tub</i><par n="ep_no-cp__n"/></e>
    <e lm="versefot"><i>versef</i><par n="f/ot__n"/></e>
    <e lm="øre"><i>ør</i><par n="ør/e_no-cp__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nov"><i>nov</i><par n="å_no-cp__n"/></e>
